Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4307
Tax Commissioner; rules and regulations.

The Tax Commissioner shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out sections 77-4301 to 77-4316.

Laws 1990, LB 260, § 7;

Laws 1991, LB 773, § 28.